New Jersey, session 221, A2190.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         As used in P.L. , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): "Certificate of eligibility with advanced standing" means a certificate with lifetime validity issued by the State Board of Examiners to candidates who meet degree, academic, and test requirements for teacher certification and complete an educator preparation program. Clinical practice means a field-based experience or internship in a kindergarten through grade 12 environment where a teacher candidate demonstrates the knowledge, skills, and dispositions necessary to be an effective educator. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the State Board of Education shall reduce the two semester and 175-hour clinical practice requirements for a candidate for a certificate of eligibility with advanced standing. c.     The Commissioner of Education shall develop recommendations for reducing the clinical practice requirements pursuant to subsection b. of this section and shall submit the recommendations to the State Board of Education.  In developing the recommendations, the commissioner shall consult with representatives of the education community including, but not limited to, the New Jersey Education Association, the New Jersey School Boards Association, the New Jersey Association of School Administrators, and the New Jersey Principals and Supervisors Association. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year following the date of enactment.